Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.148

Application of RCW 9A.44.128 through 9A.44.145—Duty to register under law as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.

(1) RCW 9A.44.128 through 9A.44.145 apply to offenders who committed their crimes and were adjudicated within the following time frames:

(a) Sex offenders convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense committed on or after February 28, 1990;

(b) Kidnapping offenders convicted of a kidnapping offense on or after July 27, 1997, for a kidnapping offense committed on or after July 27, 1997;

(c) Sex offenders who, on or after July 28, 1991, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as the result of a sex offense, regardless of when the sex offense was committed;

(d) Kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as the result of a kidnapping offense, regardless of when the kidnapping offense was committed;

(e) Any person who is or has been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW;

(f) Sex offenders who, on or after July 23, 1995, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board as the result of a sex offense, regardless of when the sex offense was committed;

(g) Kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board as the result of a kidnapping offense, regardless of when the kidnapping offense was committed;

(h) Sex offenders who move to Washington state from another state, tribe, or a foreign country and who were convicted of a sex offense under the laws of this state, another state, a foreign country, tribe, or other federal or military tribunal, regardless of when the sex offense was committed or the conviction occurred;

(i) Kidnapping offenders who move to Washington state from another state, tribe, or a foreign country and who were convicted of a kidnapping offense under the laws of this state, another state, a foreign country, tribe, or other federal or military tribunal, regardless of when the kidnapping offense was committed or the conviction occurred;

(j) Any adult or juvenile found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing a sex offense or of committing a kidnapping offense, regardless of when the offense was committed.

(2) The provisions of this section do not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under the law as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.

[ 2015 c 261 s 4.]